Arkansas, session 2025, HB1497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-36-303(1)(A), concerning the definition
of "claimant agency" for the purpose of the setoff against state tax refunds,
is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(xxvi) The Department of the Military.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-36-303(2)(D), concerning the definition
of "debt" for the purpose of the setoff against state tax refunds, is amended
to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(v) Fines imposed under § 12-64-301 and §§ 12-64-403
— 12-64-405;

*ZRC019*
03-10-2025 11:51:16 ZRC019

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 HB1497
/s/Painter



































03-10-2025 11:51:16 ZRC019